Utah statutes.
57-8-11.   Contents of deeds of units.

A deed of units may include:

(1)  a description of the land as provided in Section 57-8-10, including the book and page or entry number and date of recording of the declaration;

(2)  the unit number of the unit and any other data necessary for its proper identification;

(3)  percentage of undivided interest appertaining to the unit in the common or community areas and facilities; and

(4)  any further particulars that the grantor and grantee consider desirable to set forth consistent with the declaration and this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 268, 2007 General Session

